Indiana, session 2026, HB1274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-2-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 30. Gun Free Zone Notice
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a property and casualty insurance
policy that is issued, delivered, entered into, renewed, or amended
after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "gun free zone notice" means a
written notice stating that firearms or ammunition are prohibited
or otherwise restricted.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "insured" means an individual
who is entitled to coverage under a property and casualty
insurance policy.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "insurer" means an insurance
company that issues or delivers a property and casualty insurance
policy.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "property and casualty
insurance" means one (1) or more of the types of insurance
described in IC 27-1-5-1, Class 2 and Class 3.
Sec. 6. An insurer may not require an insured or prospective
insured to post or display a gun free zone notice.
HEA 1274

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1274